test/src/gt-desc-yamls/N-silm36_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - silm: # Noun (36) silm 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
    silm+N+Sg+Nom: silm
    silm+N+Sg+Gen: silmä
    silm+N+Sg+Par: silmä
    silm+N+Sg+Ill: silmä
    silm+N+Sg+Ine: [silmän, silmäh, silmähn]
    silm+N+Sg+Ela: silmäst
    silm+N+Sg+All: silmäle
    silm+N+Sg+Ade: silmäl
    silm+N+Sg+Abl: silmält
    silm+N+Sg+Tra: silmäs
    silm+N+Sg+Ter: silmäniq
    silm+N+Sg+Abe: silmäldäq
    silm+N+Sg+Com: silmägaq
    silm+N+Pl+Nom: silmäq
    silm+N+Pl+Gen: silmi
    silm+N+Pl+Par: silmi
    silm+N+Pl+Ill: [silmihe, silmi, silmide]
    silm+N+Pl+Ine: [silmin, silmih, silmihn]
    silm+N+Pl+Ela: silmist
    silm+N+Pl+All: silmile
    silm+N+Pl+Ade: silmil
    silm+N+Pl+Abl: silmilt
    silm+N+Pl+Tra: silmis
    silm+N+Pl+Ter: silminiq
    silm+N+Pl+Abe: silmildäq
    silm+N+Pl+Com: silmigaq
